Colorado, session 2026A, SB032.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Short title. The short title of this act is the "Ensuring
Immunization Access for Coloradans Act".
SECTION 2. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and determines that:
(a) Freedom from debilitating and life-threatening illness is
necessary to maintain Colorado's economy and prosperity;
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(b) Access to life-saving vaccines and other immunizing agents is
critical to the health of all individuals living in the state;
(c) Coloradans, including health-care providers, teachers, police and
other public safety professionals, food industry professionals, grocery and
retail workers, children in day care settings, and students from kindergarten
to college seniors, among others, should feel safe working, learning, and
participating in society; and
(d) Individuals who want to be vaccinated against disease should
have access to safe and effective vaccines that are administered by trusted
health-care professionals, with no cost sharing.
(2) Therefore, the general assembly declares that the purpose of this
act is to:
(a) Ensure consistent and equitable access to vaccines and other
immunizing agents for all Coloradans;
(b) Ensure continued alignment of the administration of vaccines
and other immunizing agents across care settings with evidence-based
science and medical standards of care, while maintaining protections for
health-care providers; and
(c) Support the health-care workforce, including physicians,
physician assistants, nurse practitioners, pharmacists, and other
professionals who are qualified to administer vaccines and immunizing
agents, in delivering safe and necessary immunization services.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 10-16-104, amend
(17)(a); and add (17)(e) as follows:
10-16-104. Mandatory coverage provisions - applicability - rules
- definitions.
(17) Human papillomavirus vaccines - rules.
(a) All individual and all group sickness and accident insurance
policies, except supplemental policies covering a specified disease or other
limited benefit, that are delivered or issued for delivery within the state by
PAGE 2-SENATE BILL 26-032

an entity subject to the provisions of part 2 of this article ARTICLE 16 and all
individual and group health-care service or indemnity contracts issued by
an entity subject to the provisions of part 3 or 4 of this article ARTICLE 16,
as well as any other group health-care coverage offered to residents of this
state, shall provide coverage for the full cost of cervical cancer HUMAN
PAPILLOMAVIRUS vaccination for all females INDIVIDUALS for whom a
vaccination is recommended by the advisory committee on immunization
practices of the United States department of health and human services
ACIP. IF THE ACIP NO LONGER RECOMMENDS HUMAN PAPILLOMAVIRUS
VACCINATIONS, THE COMMISSIONER MAY ADOPT RULES TO REQUIRE
COVERAGE IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (18) OF THIS SECTION.
(e) AS USED IN THIS SUBSECTION (17), "ACIP" HAS THE MEANING SET
FORTH IN SUBSECTION (18)(c)(I) OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-250-103, repeal (1);
and add (5.5) as follows:
12-250-103. Definitions.
As used in this article 250, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "ACIP" means the advisory committee on immunization
practices to the centers for disease control and prevention in the United
States department of health and human services or its successor entity.
(5.5) "BOARD OF HEALTH" MEANS THE STATE BOARD OF HEALTH
CREATED IN SECTION 25-1-103 (1)(a).
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-250-106, amend
(1)(c)(I)(F), (2)(e) introductory portion, (2)(e)(I), (2)(f) introductory portion,
and (2)(f)(I) as follows:
12-250-106. Practice of naturopathic medicine by naturopathic
doctors - exclusions - protected activities - definition - rules.
(1) The practice of naturopathic medicine by a naturopathic doctor
includes the following:
(c) (I) Obtaining, dispensing, administering, ordering, or
PAGE 3-SENATE BILL 26-032

prescribing, as specified, medicines listed in the naturopathic formulary,
which include:
(F) Vaccines, in accordance with the ACIP guidelines SCHEDULE OF
IMMUNIZATIONS ESTABLISHED BY THE BOARD OF HEALTH BY RULE, for
patients who are at least eighteen years of age OLD; and
(2) A naturopathic doctor shall not:
(e) Treat a child who is less than two years of age OLD, unless the
naturopathic doctor:
(I) Provides to the parent or legal guardian of the child a copy of the
most recent immunizations schedule recommended by the ACIP SCHEDULE
OF IMMUNIZATIONS ESTABLISHED BY THE BOARD OF HEATH BY RULE and
recommends that the parent or legal guardian follow the immunizations
IMMUNIZATION schedule;
(f) Treat a child who is two years of age OLD or older but less than
eight years of age OLD, unless the naturopathic doctor:
(I) Provides to the parent or legal guardian of the child a copy of the
most recent immunizations schedule recommended by the ACIP SCHEDULE
OF IMMUNIZATIONS ESTABLISHED BY THE BOARD OF HEALTH BY RULE and
recommends that the parent or legal guardian follow the immunizations
IMMUNIZATION schedule;
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-280-103, amend
(39)(g)(IV) introductory portion, (39)(g)(IV)(C), and (39)(g)(V); and add
(39)(g)(VI) as follows:
12-280-103. Definitions - rules.
As used in this article 280, unless the context otherwise requires or
the term is otherwise defined in another part of this article 280:
(39) "Practice of pharmacy" means:
(g) Exercising independent prescriptive authority:
PAGE 4-SENATE BILL 26-032

(IV) For drugs that are not controlled substances, drug categories,
or devices that are prescribed in accordance with the product's
FDA-approved labeling and to patients who are at least twelve years of age
OLD and that are limited to conditions that:
(C) Have a test that is used to guide diagnosis or clinical
decision-making and is waived under the federal "Clinical Laboratory
Improvement Amendments of 1988", Pub.L. 100-578, as amended; or
(V) For any FDA-approved product indicated for opioid use disorder
in accordance with federal law and regulations, including medications for
opioid use disorder, if authorized pursuant to part 6 of this article 280; OR
(VI) FOR VACCINES;
SECTION 7. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-280-107, add (4) as
follows:
12-280-107. Rules.
(4) NOT LATER THAN OCTOBER 1, 2026, THE BOARD SHALL REVIEW
EXISTING RECORD-KEEPING RULES TO ENSURE THAT DUPLICATE,
INCONSISTENT, OR OUTDATED RULES RELATING TO VACCINES ARE REPEALED
OR AMENDED. THE BOARD MAY CONFER WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC
HEALTH AND ENVIRONMENT AND OTHER APPLICABLE STATE AGENCIES TO
FACILITATE A CONSISTENT REGULATORY FRAMEWORK RELATING TO
VACCINES.
SECTION 8. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25-4-909, amend (2)
introductory portion and (2)(b) as follows:
25-4-909. Vaccine-related injury or death - limitations on
liability - legislative declaration.
(2) No person AN INDIVIDUAL who administers a vaccine which
THAT is required under the provisions of this part 9 to an infant or child
whose age is greater than twenty days shall NOT be held liable for injuries
sustained pursuant to such THE vaccine if:
(b) The vaccine was administered according to the schedule of
PAGE 5-SENATE BILL 26-032

immunization as published by the communicable disease control
administration of the federal government CENTERS FOR DISEASE CONTROL
AND PREVENTION IN THE UNITED STATES DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND
HUMAN SERVICES OR THE SCHEDULE OF IMMUNIZATIONS ESTABLISHED BY
RULE OF THE STATE BOARD OF HEALTH; and
SECTION 9. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25-4-1705, amend (5)
introductory portion and (5)(c) as follows:
25-4-1705. Department of public health and environment -
powers and duties - rules.
(5) The board of health, in consultation with the medical services
board in the state department of health care policy and financing and such
other persons, agencies, or organizations that the board of health deems
advisable, shall formulate AND adopt and promulgate rules governing the
implementation and operation of the infant immunization program. Such
THE rules shall MUST address the following:
(c) Which vaccines shall be required to be administered, AFTER
TAKING INTO CONSIDERATION THE RECOMMENDATIONS OF THE ADVISORY
COMMITTEE ON IMMUNIZATION PRACTICES TO THE CENTERS FOR DISEASE
CONTROL AND PREVENTION IN THE UNITED STATES DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AND HUMAN SERVICES, THE AMERICAN ACADEMY OF PEDIATRICS, THE
AMERICAN ACADEMY OF FAMILY PHYSICIANS, THE AMERICAN COLLEGE OF
OBSTETRICIANS AND GYNECOLOGISTS, OR THE AMERICAN COLLEGE OF
PHYSICIANS;
SECTION 10. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25-4-1708, amend (2)
as follows:
25-4-1708. Immunization fund - created - transfer - repeal.
(2) If federal funds are not received to implement and operate the
immunization programs created in this part 17 and part 24 of this article
ARTICLE 4, no ANY additional general fund moneys MONEY NEEDED shall be
appropriated for such purposes ADDRESSED THROUGH THE ANNUAL BUDGET
PROCESS OR EMERGENCY SUPPLEMENTAL PROCESS.
SECTION 11. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25-4-1709, amend
PAGE 6-SENATE BILL 26-032

(4); and add (4.5) as follows:
25-4-1709. Limitations on liability - repeal.
(4) (a) Where a claim BROUGHT ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 30, 2029,
against a hospital, clinic, PHARMACY, WHOLESALER, or provider arises from
injuries resulting from the handling, storage, or distribution of vaccines
required by this part 17, such THE hospital, clinic, PHARMACY,
WHOLESALER, or provider shall not be IS NOT liable unless such THE injuries
are the result of the negligent failure of an employee of such THE hospital,
clinic, PHARMACY, WHOLESALER, or provider to conform to recognized
standards of practice which THAT are necessary for the protection of public
health.
(b) THIS SUBSECTION (4) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2031.
(4.5) WHERE A CLAIM BROUGHT ON OR AFTER JANUARY 31, 2029,
AGAINST A HOSPITAL, CLINIC, PHARMACY, OR PROVIDER ARISES FROM
INJURIES RESULTING FROM THE HANDLING, STORAGE, OR DISTRIBUTION OF
VACCINES REQUIRED BY THIS PART 17, THE HOSPITAL, CLINIC, PHARMACY, OR
PROVIDER IS NOT LIABLE UNLESS THE INJURIES ARE THE RESULT OF THE
NEGLIGENT FAILURE OF AN EMPLOYEE OF THE HOSPITAL, CLINIC, PHARMACY,
OR PROVIDER TO CONFORM TO RECOGNIZED STANDARDS OF PRACTICE THAT
ARE NECESSARY FOR THE PROTECTION OF PUBLIC HEALTH.
SECTION 12. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25-4-2403, amend
(1)(f), (6)(a), and (13)(d)(III); and add (9.5) as follows:
25-4-2403. Department of public health and environment -
powers and duties - immunization tracking system - rules - definitions.
(1) In order to expand the immunization registry and increase access
to immunizations, the department may address:
(f) The ability of the department of health care policy and financing
to purchase vaccines recommended by ACIP, THE AMERICAN ACADEMY OF
PEDIATRICS, THE AMERICAN ACADEMY OF FAMILY PHYSICIANS, THE
AMERICAN COLLEGE OF OBSTETRICIANS AND GYNECOLOGISTS, OR THE
AMERICAN COLLEGE OF PHYSICIANS through a purchasing system, if
developed pursuant to this subsection (1) and subsection (1.3) of this
PAGE 7-SENATE BILL 26-032

section, for children who are enrolled in the children's basic health plan
created in article 8 of title 25.5. C.R.S.
(6) (a) The department of public health and environment or the
department's contractor may directly contact the individual who is the
subject of immunization records or the individual's parent or legal guardian
for the purpose of notifying the individual, parent, or legal guardian if
immunizations are due or overdue as indicated by the advisory committee
on immunization practices of the United States department of health and
human services or ACIP, the American Academy of Pediatrics, THE
AMERICAN ACADEMY OF FAMILY PHYSICIANS, THE AMERICAN COLLEGE OF
OBSTETRICIANS AND GYNECOLOGISTS, OR THE AMERICAN COLLEGE OF
PHYSICIANS. The department or the department's contractor shall contact the
individual, parent, or legal guardian if it is necessary to control an outbreak
of or prevent the spread of a vaccine-preventable disease pursuant to section
25-1.5-102 (1)(a) or 25-4-908.
(9.5) THE DEPARTMENT MAY NEGOTIATE FOR AND PURCHASE
VACCINES ADOPTED BY THE BOARD BY RULE OR RECOMMENDED BY ACIP,
THE AMERICAN ACADEMY OF PEDIATRICS, THE AMERICAN ACADEMY OF
FAMILY PHYSICIANS, THE AMERICAN COLLEGE OF OBSTETRICIANS AND
GYNECOLOGISTS, OR THE AMERICAN COLLEGE OF PHYSICIANS.
(13) As used in this section:
(d) "Equivalent vaccines" means two or more vaccines that:
(III) Are recommended for comparable populations by the federal
centers for disease control and prevention ACIP, THE AMERICAN ACADEMY
OF PEDIATRICS, THE AMERICAN ACADEMY OF FAMILY PHYSICIANS, THE
AMERICAN COLLEGE OF OBSTETRICIANS AND GYNECOLOGISTS, OR THE
AMERICAN COLLEGE OF PHYSICIANS.
SECTION 13. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25-4-2502, amend (2)
as follows:
25-4-2502. Definitions.
As used in this part 25, unless the context otherwise requires:
PAGE 8-SENATE BILL 26-032

(2) "Cervical cancer vaccine" or "cervical cancer immunization"
means the series of HUMAN PAPILLOMAVIRUS vaccines to prevent cervical
cancer AND OTHER CANCERS as determined by the board of health to be
necessary to conform to recognized standard medical practices.
SECTION 14. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 25-4-2503 as
follows:
25-4-2503. Cervical cancer immunization program - rules.
(1) There is hereby created in the department the cervical cancer
immunization program. The department is directed to investigate manners
in which the cervical cancer vaccine may be administered in an economical
fashion. The state board OF HEALTH is authorized to promulgate ADOPT rules
to assist the department in making the vaccine available.
(2) FQHCs are encouraged to enter into agreements with local
public health agencies to administer vaccinations to underinsured female
minors through a federally recognized vaccination program for children. If
a local public health agency enters into an agreement WITH AN FQHC, the
agency shall administer vaccinations, including but not limited to cervical
cancer vaccinations, pursuant to the agreement with the FQHC. The
department shall pay to a local public health agency the agency's
administrative cost for administering a cervical cancer vaccination to an
underinsured female MINOR entering the sixth grade.
SECTION 15. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add part 26 to article
4 of title 25 as follows:
PART 26
ADULT IMMUNIZATION ACT
25-4-2601. Short title.
THE SHORT TITLE OF THIS PART 26 IS THE "ADULT IMMUNIZATION
ACT".
25-4-2602. Legislative declaration.
(1) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DETERMINES THAT:
PAGE 9-SENATE BILL 26-032

(a) VACCINE-PREVENTABLE DISEASES REPRESENT A SERIOUS PUBLIC
HEALTH THREAT TO PEOPLE IN THE STATE;
(b) IT HAS BEEN WELL DOCUMENTED THAT VACCINES AND OTHER
IMMUNIZING AGENTS ARE AN EFFECTIVE WAY TO PREVENT SICKNESS AND
DEBILITATING DISEASE;
(c) (I) THE VACCINE MANUFACTURING SECTOR IS FOUNDATIONAL TO
COLORADO'S PUBLIC HEALTH SECURITY AND ECONOMIC STRENGTH,
SUPPORTING HIGH-SKILLED JOBS, HEALTH-CARE INFRASTRUCTURE, AND THE
CONTINUITY OF ESSENTIAL PUBLIC SERVICES;
(II) A SMALL NUMBER OF HIGHLY SPECIALIZED MANUFACTURERS
PRODUCE MOST OF THE WORLD'S VACCINES IN A COMPLEX AND
CAPITAL-INTENSIVE ENVIRONMENT, ADVANCING INFECTIOUS DISEASE
PREVENTION AND EMERGING THERAPIES, INCLUDING MRNA-BASED CANCER
TREATMENTS; AND
(III) MAINTAINING A STABLE, SCIENCE-BASED REGULATORY
FRAMEWORK IS CRITICAL TO PRESERVING MANUFACTURING CAPACITY,
SUPPORTING ONGOING INNOVATION, AND ENSURING THE ONGOING
AVAILABILITY OF SAFE AND EFFECTIVE VACCINES FOR COLORADANS; AND
(d) INDIVIDUALS WHO WANT TO BE VACCINATED AGAINST DISEASE
SHOULD HAVE ACCESS TO SAFE AND EFFECTIVE VACCINES THAT ARE
ADMINISTERED BY TRUSTED HEALTH-CARE PROFESSIONALS WITH NO COST
SHARING.
(2) THEREFORE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY DECLARES THAT
PROMOTING EVIDENCE-BASED ADMINISTRATION OF VACCINES AND OTHER
IMMUNIZING AGENTS TO ADULTS IS CRITICAL TO PRESERVING THE HEALTH OF
ALL PEOPLE IN THE STATE.
25-4-2603. Definitions.
AS USED IN THIS PART 26, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(1) "ACIP" MEANS THE ADVISORY COMMITTEE ON IMMUNIZATION
PRACTICES TO THE CENTERS FOR DISEASE CONTROL AND PREVENTION IN THE
PAGE 10-SENATE BILL 26-032

UNITED STATES DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES, OR ITS
SUCCESSOR ENTITY.
(2) "ADULT" MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS EIGHTEEN YEARS OLD OR
OLDER.
(3) "BOARD OF HEALTH" MEANS THE STATE BOARD OF HEALTH
CREATED IN SECTION 25-1-103 (1)(a).
(4) "IMMUNIZING AGENT" MEANS ANY BIOLOGICAL SUBSTANCE,
INCLUDING VACCINES, TOXOIDS, OR OTHER ANTIGENIC COMPONENTS, THAT
IS ADMINISTERED TO AN INDIVIDUAL FOR THE PURPOSE OF PRODUCING
ACTIVE OR PASSIVE IMMUNITY AGAINST A SPECIFIC DISEASE.
(5) "VACCINE" MEANS A BIOLOGICAL PREPARATION THAT CONTAINS
ANTIGENIC MATERIAL DESIGNED TO STIMULATE AN INDIVIDUAL'S IMMUNE
SYSTEM TO DEVELOP ACTIVE IMMUNITY AGAINST A SPECIFIC INFECTIOUS
DISEASE TO PREVENT ILLNESS, TYPICALLY BY INTRODUCING A WEAKENED,
INACTIVATED, OR PARTIAL FORM OF A PATHOGEN OR ITS COMPONENTS.
25-4-2604. Rules - adult immunization rules - rule-making
authority of state board of health.
(1) THE BOARD OF HEALTH SHALL ADOPT RULES ESTABLISHING A
SCHEDULE OF RECOMMENDED ADULT IMMUNIZATIONS, INCLUDING:
(a) THE VACCINES OR OTHER IMMUNIZING AGENTS RECOMMENDED
FOR ADULTS, AFTER TAKING INTO CONSIDERATION THE RECOMMENDATIONS
OF THE ACIP, THE AMERICAN ACADEMY OF PEDIATRICS, THE AMERICAN
ACADEMY OF FAMILY PHYSICIANS, THE AMERICAN COLLEGE OF
OBSTETRICIANS AND GYNECOLOGISTS, OR THE AMERICAN COLLEGE OF
PHYSICIANS; AND
(b) THE MANNER AND FREQUENCY OF ADMINISTRATION.
25-4-2605. Limitations on liability - repeal.
(1) A PERSON THAT ADMINISTERS A VACCINE OR OTHER IMMUNIZING
AGENT TO AN ADULT IS NOT LIABLE FOR INJURIES SUSTAINED PURSUANT TO
THE VACCINE OR OTHER IMMUNIZING AGENT IF:
PAGE 11-SENATE BILL 26-032

(a) THE VACCINE OR OTHER IMMUNIZING AGENT WAS ADMINISTERED
IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE SCHEDULE OF RECOMMENDED ADULT
IMMUNIZATIONS ESTABLISHED BY THE STATE BOARD OF HEALTH PURSUANT
TO SECTION 25-4-2604;
(b) THERE WERE NO MEDICAL CONTRAINDICATIONS FOR
ADMINISTERING THE VACCINE OR OTHER IMMUNIZING AGENT; AND
(c) THE VACCINE OR OTHER IMMUNIZING AGENT WAS ADMINISTERED
USING GENERALLY ACCEPTED CLINICAL METHODS.
(2) AN ACTION SHALL NOT BE MAINTAINED FOR A VACCINE-RELATED
OR IMMUNIZING-AGENT-RELATED INJURY OR DEATH UNTIL ACTION FOR
COMPENSATION FOR THE ALLEGED INJURY IS EXHAUSTED UNDER THE TERMS
OF THE FEDERAL "NATIONAL CHILDHOOD VACCINE INJURY ACT OF 1986",
42 U.S.C. SECS. 300aa-10 TO 300aa-33, AS SUCH LAW IS FROM TIME TO TIME
AMENDED, SO LONG AS THE FEDERAL "NATIONAL CHILDHOOD VACCINE
INJURY ACT OF 1986" APPLIES TO THE PARTICULAR VACCINE OR IMMUNIZING
AGENT ADMINISTERED.
(3) IF THE INJURY THAT IS SUSTAINED OR THE DEATH DOES NOT FALL
WITHIN THE PARAMETERS OF THE VACCINE OR IMMUNIZING AGENT INJURY
TABLE AS DEFINED IN 42 U.S.C. SEC. 300aa-14, AS ENACTED ON NOVEMBER
14, 1986, A REBUTTABLE PRESUMPTION IS ESTABLISHED THAT THE INJURY
SUSTAINED OR THE DEATH WAS NOT DUE TO THE ADMINISTRATION OF THE
VACCINE OR IMMUNIZING AGENT. THE PRESUMPTION IS OVERCOME BY A
PREPONDERANCE OF THE EVIDENCE.
(4) (a) WHERE A CLAIM BROUGHT ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 30, 2029,
AGAINST A HOSPITAL, CLINIC, PHARMACY, WHOLESALER, OR PROVIDER
ARISES FROM INJURIES RESULTING FROM THE HANDLING, STORAGE, OR
DISTRIBUTION OF VACCINES OR IMMUNIZING AGENTS PURSUANT TO THIS
PART 26, THE HOSPITAL, CLINIC, PHARMACY, WHOLESALER, OR PROVIDER IS
NOT LIABLE UNLESS THE INJURIES ARE THE RESULT OF THE NEGLIGENT
FAILURE OF AN EMPLOYEE OF THE HOSPITAL, CLINIC, PHARMACY,
WHOLESALER, OR PROVIDER TO CONFORM TO RECOGNIZED STANDARDS OF
PRACTICE THAT ARE NECESSARY FOR THE PROTECTION OF PUBLIC HEALTH.
(b) THIS SUBSECTION (4) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2031.
PAGE 12-SENATE BILL 26-032

(5) WHERE A CLAIM BROUGHT ON OR AFTER JANUARY 31, 2029,
AGAINST A HOSPITAL, CLINIC, PHARMACY, OR PROVIDER ARISES FROM
INJURIES RESULTING FROM THE HANDLING, STORAGE, OR DISTRIBUTION OF
VACCINES OR IMMUNIZING AGENTS PURSUANT TO THIS PART 26, THE
HOSPITAL, CLINIC, PHARMACY, OR PROVIDER IS NOT LIABLE UNLESS THE
INJURIES ARE THE RESULT OF THE NEGLIGENT FAILURE OF AN EMPLOYEE OF
THE HOSPITAL, CLINIC, PHARMACY, OR PROVIDER TO CONFORM TO
RECOGNIZED STANDARDS OF PRACTICE THAT ARE NECESSARY FOR THE
PROTECTION OF PUBLIC HEALTH.
SECTION 16. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25.5-8-107, amend
(5) as follows:
25.5-8-107. Duties of the department - schedule of services -
premiums - copayments - subsidies - purchase of childhood
immunizations.
(5) The department may purchase vaccines recommended by the
advisory committee on immunization practices to the centers for disease
control and prevention in the federal department of health and human
services, or its successor entity, THE AMERICAN ACADEMY OF PEDIATRICS,
THE AMERICAN ACADEMY OF FAMILY PHYSICIANS, THE AMERICAN COLLEGE
OF OBSTETRICIANS AND GYNECOLOGISTS, OR THE AMERICAN COLLEGE OF
PHYSICIANS through a vaccine purchasing system, if such a system is
developed pursuant to section 25-4-2403 (1), C.R.S., for children enrolled
in the children's basic health plan.
SECTION 17. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 13-SENATE BILL 26-032

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
James Rashad Coleman, Sr. Julie McCluskie
PRESIDENT OF SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
____________________________ ____________________________
Esther van Mourik Vanessa Reilly
SECRETARY OF CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 14-SENATE BILL 26-032